Florida, session 2026, SB132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âSubsection (4) is added to section 20.32, 30 Florida Statutes, to read: 31 20.32âFlorida Commission on Offender Review.â 32 (4)(a)âFor the purpose of assisting a person who has been 33 disqualified from voting based on a felony conviction other than 34 murder or a felony sexual offense in determining whether he or 35 she has met the requirements under s. 98.0751 to have his or her 36 voting rights restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of the State 37 Constitution, the Florida Commission on Offender Review shall 38 develop and maintain a database that contains for each such 39 person all of the following information: 40 1.âHis or her name and any other personal identifying 41 information. 42 2.âThe remaining length of any term of supervision, 43 including, but not limited to, probation, community control, or 44 parole, ordered by a court as a part of his or her sentence. 45 3.âThe remaining amount of any restitution owed to a victim 46 as ordered by a court as a part of his or her sentence. 47 4.âThe remaining amount due of any fines or fees that were 48 initially ordered by a court as a part of his or her sentence or 49 as a condition of any form of supervision, including, but not 50 limited to, probation, community control, or parole. 51 5.âThe completion status of any other term ordered by a 52 court as a part of his or her sentence. 53 6.âAny other information needed to determine whether he or 54 she has met the requirements for restoration of voting rights 55 under s. 98.0751. 56 (b)âThe Department of State, the Department of Corrections, 57 the clerks of the circuit courts, the county comptrollers, and 58 the Board of Executive Clemency shall provide to the commission 59 monthly any information held by these governmental entities 60 which is required under paragraph (a). 61 (c)âThe Department of Management Services, acting through 62 the Florida Digital Service, shall provide any technical 63 assistance necessary for the commission to develop and maintain 64 the database. The Department of Management Services may adopt 65 rules to provide such assistance. 66 (d)âBy July 1, 2029, subject to legislative appropriation, 67 the commission shall make the database available to the public 68 on an Internet website. The commission shall update the database 69 monthly with the information received from each governmental 70 entity under paragraph (b). The commission shall publish on the 71 website clear instructions that a person who has been 72 disqualified from voting based on a felony conviction other than 73 murder or a felony sexual offense may follow to have his or her 74 voting rights restored and to register to vote. 75 (e)âBy July 1, 2027, the commission shall provide a 76 comprehensive plan to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 77 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives which includes 78 all of the following: 79 1.âThe governmental entities from which and the methods by 80 which the commission shall collect, centralize, analyze, and 81 secure the information required to be included in the database. 82 2.âA description of any infrastructure and services, 83 including, but not limited to, software, hardware, and 84 information technology services, which may be necessary to 85 create and maintain the database. 86 3.âThe anticipated number of additional employees necessary 87 for: 88 a.âThe commission to develop and maintain the database. 89 b.âA governmental entity to provide the information 90 required under paragraph (b). 91 c.âThe Florida Digital Service to provide the assistance 92 required under paragraph (c). 93 4.âThe anticipated initial cost to develop the database; 94 the annual cost to maintain the database; and the annual 95 appropriation required to fund the anticipated costs incurred by 96 the commission, each governmental entity, and the Florida 97 Digital Service. 98 5.âAny legal authority necessary for the commission to 99 develop and maintain the database. 100 6.âDraft legislation to implement the comprehensive plan. 101 (f)âNotwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person who 102 registers to vote or who votes in reasonable reliance on 103 information contained in the database indicating that his or her 104 voting rights have been restored pursuant to s. 4, Art. VI of 105 the State Constitution has an affirmative right to register and 106 to vote and may not be charged with a violation of any criminal 107 law of this state related to fraudulently voting or registering 108 to vote. 109 (g)âThe commission shall adopt rules to implement this 110 subsection. 111 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.